California, session 20252026, SB1309.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1367.58 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1367.58. (a) A health care service plan contract, excluding a specialized health care service plan contract, issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for followup screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer recommended by a health care provider acting within the scope of their practice.(b) (1) Coverage required pursuant to this section shall not be subject to copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other form of cost sharing.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a health care service plan contract is a high deductible health plan, as defined in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the contract shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, or any other cost sharing on the coverage required pursuant to this section unless not imposing the deductible, coinsurance, or cost sharing would conflict with the federal requirements for high deductible health plans, including those requirements defining exempt preventive care.(c) For purposes of this section, “followup screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer” means a service provided after an initial abnormal or indeterminate test result, including, but not limited to, a diagnostic computed tomography scan, positron emission tomography/computed tomography scan, tissue sampling, biopsy, bronchoscopy, pathology, and surgical consultation.SEC. 2. Section 10123.78 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.78. (a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for followup screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer recommended by a health care provider acting within the scope of their practice.(b) (1) Coverage required pursuant to this section shall not be subject to copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other form of cost sharing.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a health insurance policy is a high deductible health plan, as defined in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the policy shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, or any other cost sharing on the coverage required pursuant to this section unless not imposing the deductible, coinsurance, or cost sharing would conflict with the federal requirements for high deductible health plans, including those requirements defining exempt preventive care.(c) For purposes of this section, “followup screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer” means a service provided after an initial abnormal or indeterminate test result, including, but not limited to, a diagnostic computed tomography scan, positron emission tomography/computed tomography scan, tissue sampling, biopsy, bronchoscopy, pathology, and surgical consultation.(d) This section does not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that covers only dental, mental health, or vision benefits.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.